Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201277-1706
Collection of taxes; receipts; how
numbered.

All
receipts issued by the county treasurer for taxes paid to him or her shall
be numbered consecutively.

Laws 1903, c. 73, § 149, p. 442;

R.S.1913, § 6478;

C.S.1922, § 6001;

C.S.1929, § 77-1906;

Laws 1943, c. 174, § 1(1), p. 607;

R.S.1943, § 77-1706;

Laws 1945, c. 189, § 6, p. 589;

Laws 1993, LB 346, § 19;

Laws 1997, LB 269, § 53;

Laws 1997, LB 270, § 99;

Laws 2003, LB 292, § 13;

Laws 2012, LB851, § 3.

Tax receipt alone is not sufficient to establish fact of levy or assessment. Adams v. Osgood, 55 Neb. 766, 76 N.W. 446 (1898).